Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 36

State Horse Racing Advisory Committee [Repealed]

4-36-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 —4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

Former Chapter 36 §§4-36-101 —4-36-402 (Acts 1987, ch. 311, §§ 1-19, 21-34; 1988, ch. 813, § 1; 1988, ch. 835, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 939, § 1; 1988, ch. 950, §§ 1-4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 8; 1990, ch. 684, § 1, 2-9, 10-12; 1990, ch. 1024, § 10; 1993, ch. 248, § 1-5; 1996, ch. 1080, § 1-8; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 74, § 1, effective April 6, 2015) concerned the Racing Control Act of 1987.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the obsolescence of the Racing Control Act of 1987, see Acts 2015, ch. 74.

Attorney General Opinions. It is not permissible to conduct dog-racing activities under the Racing Control Act of 1987, T.C.A. §§4-36-101 to 402. As with horse racing, betting on dog racing is illegal. The Racing Control Act did not authorize betting on dog racing. When the racing commission ceased to exist, so too did betting on horse racing. Legislation would be required to reestablish the State Racing Commission. OAG 14-91, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92 (9/30/14).

4-36-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

4-36-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

4-36-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

4-36-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

4-36-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.

4-36-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 1040, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Chapter 36, §§4-36-101 –4-36-107, concerned the state horse racing advisory committee.